Alabama, session 2026rs, SB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
Page 1

Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
SB48 INTRODUCED
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) FOUR-POINT RESTRAINT. To restrain or confine an
individual face-down on the ground by connecting or fastening
the individual's hands and legs behind the individual's back.
(2) LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY. As defined in Section
36-21-40, Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER. As defined in Section
36-21-40, Code of Alabama 1975.
(b) A law enforcement officer shall not do either of
the following:
(1) Use a four-point restraint to detain, restrain, or
transport any individual.
(2) Place any individual in a face-down position that
restricts oxygen or blood flow to the individual's head or
neck.
(c) Each law enforcement agency shall include a
prohibition against the use of a four-point restraint in the
agency's existing policies and procedures.
(d) The use of four-point restraint in violation of
this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2